pt-BR: Tipo de efeitos fotográficos: Antigo; Arte; Preto; Calma; Cinema; Em relevo; Fader; Grisalho; Espelho; Mosaico; Silenciado; Filme negativo; Neutra; Pastel; Filme positivo; Sépia; Tons de pele; Solarização; Tela dividida; Vintage; Vívido; Branco; Outro
el: Τύπος φωτογραφικών εφέ: Αντίκα; Τέχνη; Μαύρο; Ήπιο; Κινηματογραφικός; Ανάγλυφο; Βαθμιαία εξασθένηση; Γκρι; Καθρέφτης; Μωσαϊκό; Σίγαση; Αρνητικό φιλμ; Ουδέτερο; Παστέλ; Θετικό φιλμ; Σέπια; Τόνοι δέρματος; Ηλιακή ακτινοβολία; Διαίρεση οθόνης; Vintage; Έντονο; Λευκό; Άλλο
th: ประเภทเอฟเฟกต์ภาพถ่าย: โบราณ; ศิลปะ; สีดำ; เงียบสงบ; โรงภาพยนตร์; ลายนูน; เฟดเดอร์; ผมหงอก; กระจก; โมเสก; โทนเย็น; ฟิล์มเนกาทีฟ; สีโทนกลาง; สีพาสเทล; ฟิล์มโพสิทีฟ; ซีเปีย; โทนสีผิว; เอฟเฟกต์โซลาไรซ์เซชัน; แยกจอ; วินเทจ; สดใส; ขาว; อื่นๆ
en: Photo effects type: Antique; Art; Black; Calm; Cinema; Emboss; Fader; Gray; Mirror; Mosaic; Muted; Negative film; Neutral; Pastel; Positive film; Sepia; Skin tones; Solarisation; Split screen; Vintage; Vivid; White; Other
cs: Typ fotografických efektů: Starožitný; Umění; Černá; Klidný; Kino; Reliéfní; Slábnoucí; Šedé; Zrcadlo; Mozaika; Tlumený; Negativní film; Neutrální; Pastelový; Pozitivní film; Sépie; Tóny pleti; Solarizace; Rozdělená obrazovka; Retro; Živý; Bílé; Jiné
da: Fotoeffekttype: Antik; Kunst; Sort; Rolig; Biograf; Præget; Fader; Gråt; Spejl; Mosaik; Slået fra; Negativ film; Neutral; Pastel; Positiv film; Sepia; Hudfarver; Solarisering; Delt skærm; Vintage; Levende; Hvid; Andet
hu: Fotóeffektusok típusa: Antik; Művészet; Fekete; Nyugodt; Mozi; Dombornyomott; Halványító; Szürke; Tükör; Mozaik; Tompított; Negatív film; Semleges; Pasztell; Pozitív film; Szépia; Bőrtónusok; Szolarizáció; Osztott képernyő; Vintage; Élénk; Fehér; Egyéb
nb: Type fotoeffekter: Antikk; Kunst; Sort; Rolig; Kino; Preg; Fader; Grå; Speil; Mosaikk; Dempet; Negativ film; Nøytral; Pastell; Positiv film; Sepia; Hudtone; Solarisering; Delt skjerm; Årgang; Levende; Hvit; Annen
sv: Fotoeffekttyp: Gammaldags; Konst; Svart; Lugna; Bio; Utföra i relief; Fader; Grått; Spegel; Mosaik; Dämpad; Negativ film; Neutral; Pastell; Positiv film; Sepia; Hudtoner; Solarisering; Delad skärm; Vintage; Levande; Vitt; Annat
zh-CN: 照片效果类型: 古董; 艺术; 黑色; 平静; 电影; 浮雕; 渐变; 灰色; 镜子; 马赛克; 静音; 底片; 中性色; 彩色; 正片; 深褐色; 肤色; 日晒; 分屏; 复古; 生动; 白; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de efecte foto: Antic; Artă; Negru; Calm; Cinema; Imprimare în relief; Estompat; Gri; Oglindă; Mozaic; Intensitate redusă; Negativ; Neutru; Pastel; Pozitiv; Sepia; Nuanțele tenului; Solarizare; Ecran împărțit; Vintage; Vibrant; Alb; Altele
tr: Fotoğraf Efektleri Türü: Antik; Sanat; Siyah; Sakin; Sinema; Kabartma; Azaltıcı; Beyazlamış; Ayna; Mozaik; Sessize alındı; Negatif film; Nötr; Pastel; Pozitif film; Sepya; Cilt Tonları; Solukluk; Bölünmüş ekran; Nostaljik; Canlı; Beyaz; Diğer
lt-LT: Nuotraukų efektų tipas: Antikvarinis; Menas; Juoda; Ramus; Kinas; Reljefinis; Išblunkantis; Žili; Veidrodinis; Mozaika; Prigesintas; Negatyvinė juostelė; Neutralus; Pastelė; Pozityvinė juostelė; Sepija; Odos atspalviai; Soliarizacija; Padalytasis ekranas; Vintažinis; Ryškus; Balta; Kita
nl: Foto-effectentype: Antiek; Kunst; Zwart; Kalm; Cinema; Relièf; Fader; Grijs; Spiegel; Mozaïek; Gedempt; Negatieve film; Neutraal; Pastel; Positieve film; Sepia; Huidskleuren; Solarisatie; Gesplitst scherm; Vintage; Levendig; Wit; Andere
sl-SI: Vrsta fotografskih učinkov: Starinsko; Umetnost; Črno; Umirjeno; Cinema; Reliefno; Bledenje; Siva; Zrcalno; Mozaik; Medlo; Negativni film; Nevtralno; Pastel; Pozitiven film; Sepia; Toni kože; Solarizacija; Razdeljen zaslon; Vintage; Živo; Beli; Drugo
es: Tipo de efectos fotográficos: Antiguo; Arte; Negro; Calma; Cine; Relieve; Fader; Gris; Espejo; Mosaico; Apagado; Película negativa; Neutro; Pastel; Película positiva; Sepia; Tonos de piel; Solarización; Pantalla dividida; Vintage; Vívido; Blanco; Otros
zh-TW: 照片效果類型: 古物; 藝術; 黑色; 平靜; 電影; 浮雕; 透明度; 灰白; 鏡面; 馬賽克; 柔和; 負片; 中性; 粉彩; 正片; 棕褐色; 膚色; 中途曝光; 分割畫面底片; 復古; 生動; 白; 其他
pl: Typ efektów zdjęciowych: Antyk; Sztuka; Czarny; Spokojny; Kino; Wytłaczanie; Fader; Szary; Lustro; Mozaika; Wyciszenie; Negatyw; Neutralne; Pastelowy; Pozytyw; Sepia; Odcienie skóry; Solaryzacja; Podzielony ekran; Vintage; Jaskrawy; Białe; Pozostałe
fi: Valokuvatehostetyyppi: Antiikkinen; Taide; Musta; Rauhallinen; Elokuva; Kohokuvio; Haalistunut; Harmaa; Peili; Mosaiikki; Vaimennetty; Negatiivifilmi; Neutraali; Pastelli; Positiivifilmi; Sepia; Ihonväri; Solarisaatio; Jaettu näyttö; Vintage; Eloisa; Valkoinen; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta fotografskih efekata: Starinsko; Umjetnost; Crna; Smirujuće; Kinematski; Reljefni; Izblijeđeno; Siva; Zrcalno; Mozaik; Prigušeno; Negativ filma; Neutralno; Pastel; Pozitiv filma; Sepija; Tonovi kože; Solarizacija; Podijeljeni ekran; Vintage; Živopisno; Bijela; Ostalo
de: Fotoeffekttyp: Antik; Kunst; Schwarz; Ruhig; Kino; Prägen; Fader; Grau; Spiegel; Mosaik; Stummgeschaltet; Negativfilm; Neutral; Pastell; Positivfilm; Sepia; Hauttöne; Solarisation; Geteilter Bildschirm; Vintage; Lebendig; Weiß; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип фото ефекти: Античен; Изкуство; Черен; Спокойно; Кино; Релеф; Фейдър; Сив; Огледало; Мозайка; Приглушен; Негативен филм; Неутрален; Пастел; Позитивен филм; Сепия; Тонове на кожата; Соларизация; Разделен екран; Винтидж; Ярък; Бял; Други
fr: Type d’effets photo: Antique; Art; Noir; Calme; Cinéma; Relief; Fondu; Gris; Miroir; Mosaïque; En sourdine; Film négatif; Neutre; Pastel; Film positif; Sépia; Teints; Solarisation; Écran divisé; Vintage; Vif; Blanc; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de efeitos fotográficos: Antigo; Arte; Preto; Calmo; Cinema; Em relevo; Desbotado; Grisalho; Espelho; Mosaico; Esbatido; Negativo de filme; Neutro; Pastel; Filme positivo; Sépia; Tons de pele; Solarização; Ecrã dividido; Vintage; Vívido; Branco; Outro
ja: 写真効果の種類: アンティーク; アート; ブラック; 落ち着いた; シネマ; エンボス; フェーダー; 白髪; ミラー; モザイク; ミュート; ネガフィルム; ニュートラル; パステル; ポジフィルム; セピア; 肌の色合い; ソラリゼーション; スプリットスクリーン; ヴィンテージ; ビビッド; ホワイト; その他
ko: 사진 효과 유형: 앤틱; 미술; 검은색; 차분한; 시네마; 엠보싱; 페이더; 회색; 거울; 모자이크; 뮤트; 음화 필름; 중성색; 파스텔; 양화 필름; 세피아; 피부톤; 솔라리제이션; 분할 화면; 빈티지; 생생한; 화이트; 기타
ru: Тип фотоэффектов: Антик; Искусство; Черный; Спокойствие; Кино; Тиснение; Затухание; Серый; Зеркало; Мозаика; Приглушенный; Негатив; Нейтральный; Пастель; Позитивная пленка; Сепия; Тон кожи; Соляризация; Разделение экрана; Винтаж; Яркий; Белый; Другое
vi: Loại hiệu ứng hình ảnh: Cổ xưa; Nghệ thuật; Màu đen; Êm đềm; Rạp chiếu phim; Dập nổi; Phai dần; Tóc bạc; Gương; Khảm; Lặng; Phim âm bản; Màu trung tính; Phấn màu; Phim dương bản; Nâu đỏ; Màu da; Chớp sáng; Màn hình chia nhỏ; Cổ điển; Sống động; Vang trắng; Khác
sk-SK: Typ fotografických efektov: Starožitný; Umenie; Čierny; Pokojný; Kino; Embosovať; Zoslabovač; Šedý; Zrkadlo; Mozaika; Stlmený; Negatívny film; Neutrálny; Pastelový; Pozitívny film; Sépiový; Tóny pleti; Solarizácia; Rozdelená obrazovka; Archívny; Živý; Biely; Iné
it: Tipo di effetti fotografici: Anticato; Arte; Nero; Calmo; Cinema; Rilievo; Sfumato; Grigio; Specchio; Mosaico; Disattivato; Pellicola negativa; Neutro; Pastello; Pellicola positiva; Seppia; Incarnati; Solarizzazione; Schermo diviso; Vintage; Vivido; Bianco; Altro